Hawaii, session 2025, HB888.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that access to affordable, quality child and elderly care services remains a critical challenge for Hawaii's working families. The cost of facilities represents one of the largest barriers for care providers to establish and maintain sustainable operations throughout the State.  The State can play a pivotal role in expanding access to care services by incorporating dedicated care facilities into new state building construction and major renovation projects, simultaneously addressing the facilities cost barrier for care providers while maximizing the utility of state buildings to serve Hawaii's families.  The State can also charge care facility operators below-market rents, and those savings may be applied toward recruiting staff, paying higher wages, charging a lower tuition, and expanding enrollment. The purpose of this Act is to require that new and newly renovated state buildings having a budget of $5,000,000 or more include dedicated space for a child care center or an adult day care center. SECTION 2.  Chapter 346, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part VIII to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§346-     State buildings; child care; adult care spaces.  (a) Each state project: (1)  Having a budget of $5,000,000 or more for: (A)  A newly constructed state building; or (B)  The renovation of a state building; and (2)  At which at least an estimated two hundred fifty individuals will: (A)  Live; or (B)  Work, shall include appropriate space dedicated for a group child care center or an adult day care center, or both. (b) The space dedicated for a group child care center or an adult day care center shall also include: (1)  A kitchen appropriate for reheating food; (2)  Restroom facilities; and (3)  Appropriate outdoor space. (c)  The use of any space dedicated for a group child care center or an adult day care center under this section shall be limited to persons licensed to operate: (1)  A group child care center under chapter 346, part VIII, subpart B; or (2)  An adult day care center licensed by the department by rule adopted under chapter 91." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________